Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 Employee Benefit Plan Council

Administrative rules and regulations.

Flexible Benefits Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of the State Personnel Board, Chapter 478-2.

45-18-50.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

Reserved.

“Council” means the Employee Benefit Plan Council established in Code Section 45-18-51.

“Employee” means a member of the General Assembly or a person who works full time for the state and receives his or her compensation in a direct payment from a department, agency, authority, or institution of state government; a county department of family and children services or a county department of health; the Federal-State Shipping Point Inspection Service; the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund; a member of any local board of education; and public school teachers and public school employees as defined in Code Sections 20-2-880 and 20-2-910, exclusive of the members, employees, and officials of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

“Full time” means the employment of a person who works at least 30 hours per week and whose employment is intended to be continuing employment. This would exclude any student, seasonal, intermittent, or part-time employment; provided, however, that public school teachers and public school employees as defined in Code Sections 20-2-880 and 20-2-910 shall be deemed to be employed full time for the purposes of this article. This would also exclude employment intended for only a very limited duration or in a sheltered employment program for the purpose of training or transitioning a person into the continued employment environment.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1247, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1071, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1425, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-76/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-18-51.
Creation and operation of council.

There is created an Employee Benefit Plan Council consisting of the following ten members appointed by the Governor:

The five members of the State Personnel Board who shall serve for terms of office which correspond with their terms of office on the State Personnel Board;

Two department heads who have employees eligible to participate in the employee benefit plans, which department heads shall serve for terms of office of four years; provided, however, that the initial term of one of such appointees shall be two years; and provided, further, that the office of such a member shall become vacant if he or she ceases to be a department head;

Two state employees who are eligible to participate in the employee benefit plans, which state employees shall serve for terms of office of four years; provided, however, that the initial term of one of such appointees shall be two years; and provided, further, that the office of such a member shall become vacant if he or she ceases to be a state employee; and

One member from a corporation domiciled in the State of Georgia that insures or administers employee benefit plans, which member shall serve for a term of office of four years.

Successors to the members of the council provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have the same qualifications and shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of office of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. A vacancy on the council shall be filled by the Governor appointing a successor who possesses the same qualifications as his or her predecessor and who shall serve for the unexpired term.

The members of the council who are in state employment shall serve without compensation but, subject to fund availability, shall be reimbursed by the state department in which they are employed for all necessary expenses that may be incurred in the performance of their duties under this article in accordance with state travel regulations promulgated by the State Accounting Office. For those councilmembers who are not in state employment, the expense and mileage allowance shall be the same as that authorized for the General Assembly and shall be payable, subject to fund availability, from the Department of Administrative Services.

The Governor shall appoint one member to act as chairperson for a term specified by the Governor until a successor is duly appointed. The council shall elect one of its members as vice chairperson to act in the absence of the chairperson. If the office of chairperson is vacated for any reason, the Governor shall appoint a successor.

Meetings of the council shall be scheduled at the discretion of the council chairperson and, where feasible, concomitant with the meetings of the State Personnel Board as provided in Chapter 20 of this title. All meetings of the council shall be open to the public.

The council shall adopt procedures for the conduct of its activities.

The commissioner of administrative services shall serve as executive secretary to the council and provide the council with staff support and other assistance in carrying out its duties.

In the promulgation of rules and regulations, the council shall be governed by Chapter 20 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 38/HB 293; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-77/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-18-52.
Establishment of flexible employee benefit plans.

The council is authorized to establish a flexible employee benefit plan for employees of the state and public schoolteachers and public school employees and to promulgate rules and regulations for its administration, subject to the limitations contained in this article and in Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter. The flexible employee benefit plan may provide for deductions or salary reductions for group life insurance, group property and casualty insurance, disability insurance, supplemental health and accident insurance, health care or dependent care spending accounts as authorized under Section 125 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, other types of employee welfare benefits, or for salary reductions for health premiums under Article 1 of this chapter and Code Sections 20-2-880 and 20-2-910. The council may establish rating categories for disability insurance based on eligibility for coverage by the disability program of the Social Security Administration. At the council’s discretion, any of the insurance or other type of employee welfare benefits authorized by this Code section may be operated as a self-insured plan in whole or in part or by contract with any company authorized to transact such business in this state. Except as provided in Code Section 45-18-30, Code Sections 20-2-880 and 20-2-910, and as implemented prior to January 1, 1986, the council is authorized to establish the plan or plans in connection with plans authorized by the United States Internal Revenue Code for the purpose of income tax advantage.

The council is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to require local school boards that elect coverage under the plan as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-18-54 to enroll and maintain a minimum participation percentage when offering the plan to its employees.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 567, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1247, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2111, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “schoolteachers” was substituted for “school teachers” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “self-insured” was substituted for “self insured” in subsection (a).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Flexible benefits program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Employee Benefit Plan Council, Chapter 478.2.

45-18-53.
Authorization for payroll deductions.

In order to carry out the provisions of the flexible employee benefit plan, the head of each department, agency, authority, county department of health, the Federal-State Shipping Point Inspection Service, the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, or local school system is authorized to deduct or reduce from salary or wages voluntarily designated amounts by his employees for purchasing insurance or other welfare benefits.

Records of benefit selections, payroll deductions, and other individual account information shall be maintained as confidential by the flexible benefit plan. The records shall not be disclosed except as necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article or as otherwise authorized in writing by the employee. This prohibition shall not bar federal, state, or local tax authorities from such access to the records as may be necessary to establish the tax status or liability of an employee or other individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1247, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1425, § 2.

45-18-54.
Continuation of optional plans; approval of optional plans or contracting with new or additional insurers.

The head of each department, agency, authority, or county department of health shall have the option to determine whether or not the employees within his respective agency shall continue any optional program that is in operation on January 1, 1986. New optional employee benefit plans or any contracting with new or additional insurers under existing plans that authorize the deduction or reduction of voluntarily designated amounts, including insurance, from the salaries of the full-time employees must be approved by the council after January 1, 1986, except that the Legislative Services Committee may continue or approve any optional program for members of the General Assembly and employees of the General Assembly.

Each local board of education shall have the option to elect coverage in this program, and, in the event an employee rejects coverage, such employee shall be authorized to obtain coverage at a later date upon compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the council relative thereto. New optional employee benefit plans or any contracting with new or additional insurers under existing plans that authorize the deduction or reduction of voluntarily designated amounts, including insurance, from the salaries of the full-time employees must be approved by the council after January 1, 1991. Each local board of education electing to participate in the coverage under this plan shall be assessed a pro rata share of the cost of administering the plan.

Each local board of education electing coverage shall have the option to determine whether or not the employees within the school system shall continue any optional program that is in operation on January 1, 1991.

The Geo. L. Smith II Georgia World Congress Center Authority shall have the option to irrevocably elect or reject coverage for employees of the authority in this program no later than June 30, 2014. New optional employee benefit plans or any contracting with new or additional insurers under existing plans that authorize the deduction or reduction of voluntarily designated amounts, including insurance, from the salaries of the full-time employees must be approved by the council. If the authority elects to participate in the coverage under this plan, it shall be assessed a pro rata share of the cost of administering the plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1247, § 4; Ga. L. 2014, p. 129, § 2/HB 246.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

45-18-55.
Commissioner of administrative services as executive officer and custodian.

The commissioner of administrative services shall be the executive officer for the administration of this article and the custodian of such fund or funds as may be required in the implementation of this article. The commissioner of administrative services shall employ such personnel as may be necessary to carry out his or her duties and responsibilities under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-78/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-18-56.
Execution of contracts by commissioner; bidding procedure.

The commissioner is authorized to execute a contract or contracts to provide the benefits as approved in the plan or plans in accordance with this article. Such contract or contracts may be executed with one or more corporations licensed to transact business in this state, or the plan or plans, except for life, disability, or individual supplemental accident and sickness insurance, may be totally self-administered. Prior to entering into any contract under this Code section, the commissioner shall invite proposals from and allow a reasonable time for qualified corporations or qualified entities to bid on providing approved plan or plans benefits. The commissioner may invite proposals from any qualified entity as in the opinion of the council would desire to accept any part of the benefits authorized by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45.

45-18-57.
Contributions from state departments, boards, and agencies.

The various departments, boards, and agencies of the state government may contribute such portions of the cost of such benefits and the administration thereof as may be established by the general appropriations Act.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1.

45-18-58.
Liability for errors or omissions.

The various departments, boards, agencies, and their employees shall not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the agreement between the departments, boards, and agencies and the employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 441, § 1.